WebApplication17/ckDil/server/dictionaries/tr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3942 N 1
SFX 3942 0 ılmalarına .
SFX 3944 N 1
SFX 3944 0 ılmayacağını .
SFX 3943 N 1
SFX 3943 0 nmamalıdır .
SFX 3945 N 1
SFX 3945 0 nmayacağına .
SFX 3946 N 1
SFX 3946 0 leşememiş .
SFX 3947 N 1
SFX 3947 0 emeyenlerin .
SFX 3948 N 1
SFX 3948 0 larındakilerin .
SFX 3951 N 1
SFX 3951 0 larla .
SFX 3950 N 1
SFX 3950 0 acağımız .
SFX 3949 N 1
SFX 3949 0 laşmaktan .
SFX 3952 N 1
SFX 3952 0 ilişi .
SFX 3953 N 1
SFX 3953 0 laştırmışlar .
SFX 3956 N 1
SFX 3956 0 mişsin .
SFX 3955 N 1
SFX 3955 0 leyeceği .
SFX 3954 N 1
SFX 3954 0 ilememiş .
SFX 3957 N 1
SFX 3957 0 lanışını .
SFX 3958 N 1
SFX 3958 0 leştirilmeye .
SFX 3959 N 1
SFX 3959 0 nacak .
SFX 3961 N 1
SFX 3961 0 necektir .
SFX 3960 N 1
SFX 3960 0 'iyle .
SFX 3962 N 1
SFX 3962 0 latıldığını .
SFX 3963 N 1
SFX 3963 0 yışına .
SFX 3964 N 1
SFX 3964 0 cıyım .
SFX 3965 N 1
SFX 3965 0 cılarıyla .
SFX 3966 N 1
SFX 3966 0 malardır .
SFX 3967 N 1
SFX 3967 0 ıldığına .
SFX 3968 N 1
SFX 3968 0 lıyor .
SFX 3970 N 1
SFX 3970 0 indeymiş .
SFX 3969 N 1
SFX 3969 0 ilemezdi .
SFX 3971 N 1
SFX 3971 0 yemiyor .
SFX 3972 N 1
SFX 3972 0 mayanın .
SFX 3973 N 1
SFX 3973 0 nmayacağını .
SFX 3974 N 1
SFX 3974 0 lıyla .
SFX 3975 N 1
SFX 3975 0 nmek .
SFX 3976 N 1
SFX 3976 0 leştirilmesi .
SFX 3977 N 1
SFX 3977 0 leşen .
SFX 3978 N 1
SFX 3978 0 nden .
SFX 3979 N 1
SFX 3979 0 mesinden .
SFX 3981 N 1
SFX 3981 0 ımlarının .
SFX 3980 N 1
SFX 3980 0 dırdık .
SFX 3982 N 1
SFX 3982 0 inizden .
SFX 3983 N 1
SFX 3983 0 ciydi .
SFX 3984 N 1
SFX 3984 0 nmez .
SFX 3988 N 1
SFX 3988 0 ışın .
SFX 3987 N 1
SFX 3987 0 mamasının .
SFX 3986 N 1
SFX 3986 0 lemelerinde .
SFX 3985 N 1
SFX 3985 0 lenmesinde .
SFX 3990 N 1
SFX 3990 0 leştirmeden .
SFX 3989 N 1
SFX 3989 0 ışım .
SFX 3991 N 1
SFX 3991 0 diler .
SFX 3992 N 1
SFX 3992 0 emediklerine .
SFX 3993 N 1
SFX 3993 0 ıldığını .
SFX 3994 N 1
SFX 3994 0 işinden .
SFX 3995 N 1
SFX 3995 0 emediklerini .
SFX 3996 N 1
SFX 3996 0 lamaları .
SFX 3997 N 1
SFX 3997 0 dan .
SFX 3998 N 1
SFX 3998 0 dırdığını .
SFX 3999 N 1
SFX 3999 0 nmediği .
SFX 4000 N 1
SFX 4000 0 sallığını .
SFX 4001 N 1
SFX 4001 0 malılar .
SFX 4002 N 1
SFX 4002 0 macıları .
SFX 4003 N 1
SFX 4003 0 namıyor .
SFX 4004 N 1
SFX 4004 0 nmış .
SFX 4005 N 1
SFX 4005 0 lemeyeceklerini .
SFX 4006 N 1
SFX 4006 0 necekler .
SFX 4007 N 1
SFX 4007 0 tıyor .
SFX 4008 N 1
SFX 4008 0 lamayan .
SFX 4010 N 1
SFX 4010 0 mazsınız .
SFX 4009 N 1
SFX 4009 0 leşemez .
SFX 4012 N 1
SFX 4012 0 lan .
SFX 4011 N 1
SFX 4011 0 layabileceğini .
SFX 4013 N 1
SFX 4013 0 undaydı .
SFX 4016 N 1
SFX 4016 0 lar .
SFX 4015 N 1
SFX 4015 0 layabileceğine .
SFX 4014 N 1
SFX 4014 0 leştirecekleri .
SFX 4017 N 1
SFX 4017 0 cılarından .
SFX 4018 N 1
SFX 4018 0 lıydı .
SFX 4019 N 1
SFX 4019 0 ışındaki .
SFX 4020 N 1
SFX 4020 0 acağı .
SFX 4021 N 1
SFX 4021 0 inizdeki .
SFX 4022 N 1
SFX 4022 0 ebileceklerini .
SFX 4024 N 1
SFX 4024 0 taki .
SFX 4023 N 1
SFX 4023 0 lamamışlar .
SFX 4025 N 1
SFX 4025 0 acaksınız .
SFX 4027 N 1
SFX 4027 0 culuk .
SFX 4026 N 1
SFX 4026 0 dırabileceğini .
SFX 4028 N 1
SFX 4028 0 ebileceklerine .
SFX 4029 N 1
SFX 4029 0 nmazdı .
SFX 4030 N 1
SFX 4030 0 deyken .
SFX 4031 N 1
SFX 4031 0 liden .
SFX 4033 N 1
SFX 4033 0 mayacakları .
SFX 4032 N 1
SFX 4032 0 ndik .
SFX 4034 N 1
SFX 4034 0 amıyorduk .
SFX 4035 N 1
SFX 4035 0 amıyordum .
SFX 4038 N 1
SFX 4038 0 mamışım .
SFX 4037 N 1
SFX 4037 0 ndir .
SFX 4036 N 1
SFX 4036 0 cudan .
SFX 4039 N 1
SFX 4039 0 leşmişti .
SFX 4040 N 1
SFX 4040 0 lendirildiğini .
SFX 4041 N 1
SFX 4041 0 yamazsınız .
SFX 4044 N 1
SFX 4044 0 laştırma .
SFX 4043 N 1
SFX 4043 0 mezmiş .
SFX 4042 N 1
SFX 4042 0 landıracaklarını .
SFX 4045 N 1
SFX 4045 0 lendirildiğine .
SFX 4046 N 1
SFX 4046 0 liklerinin .
SFX 4047 N 1
SFX 4047 0 liğindedir .
SFX 4048 N 1
SFX 4048 0 laşanların .
SFX 4049 N 1
SFX 4049 0 mamışız .
SFX 4050 N 1
SFX 4050 0 ndeki .
SFX 4051 N 1
SFX 4051 0 teceğim .
SFX 4053 N 1
SFX 4053 0 yamamışlar .
SFX 4052 N 1
SFX 4052 0 muşsunuz .
SFX 4055 N 1
SFX 4055 0 larca .
SFX 4054 N 1
SFX 4054 0 namayacağına .
SFX 4056 N 1
SFX 4056 0 ciyim .
SFX 4057 N 1
SFX 4057 0 ılmakta .
SFX 4058 N 1
SFX 4058 0 ılmalarını .
SFX 4060 N 1
SFX 4060 0 tıldığında .
SFX 4059 N 1
SFX 4059 0 mışsanız .
SFX 4062 N 1
SFX 4062 0 ıldığının .
SFX 4061 N 1
SFX 4061 0 uyordum .
SFX 4063 N 1
SFX 4063 0 leyenleri .
SFX 4064 N 1
SFX 4064 0 malardan .
SFX 4065 N 1
SFX 4065 0 uyum .
SFX 4066 N 1
SFX 4066 0 meyiniz .
SFX 4069 N 1
SFX 4069 0 namaz .
SFX 4068 N 1
SFX 4068 0 tüklerini .
SFX 4067 N 1
SFX 4067 0 uyorduk .
SFX 4070 N 1
SFX 4070 0 dıklarının .
SFX 4071 N 1
SFX 4071 0 ladıklarını .
SFX 4072 N 1
SFX 4072 0 larda .
SFX 4073 N 1
SFX 4073 0 nacaktı .
SFX 4074 N 1
SFX 4074 0 uyuz .
SFX 4075 N 1
SFX 4075 0 leşmeyi .
SFX 4078 N 1
SFX 4078 0 leşmeye .
SFX 4077 N 1
SFX 4077 0 ılamadığının .
SFX 4076 N 1
SFX 4076 0 tamadık .
SFX 4082 N 1
SFX 4082 0 memelidir .
SFX 4081 N 1
SFX 4081 0 yışını .
SFX 4080 N 1
SFX 4080 0 dakiler .
SFX 4079 N 1
SFX 4079 0 ilmedi .
SFX 4084 N 1
SFX 4084 0 lamalarının .
SFX 4083 N 1
SFX 4083 0 laştırdı .
SFX 4085 N 1
SFX 4085 0 çilerine .
SFX 4086 N 1
SFX 4086 0 çular .
SFX 4087 N 1
SFX 4087 0 çilerini .
SFX 4088 N 1
SFX 4088 0 ımında .
SFX 4089 N 1
SFX 4089 0 lenenler .
SFX 4090 N 1
SFX 4090 0 leştirdiklerini .
SFX 4091 N 1
SFX 4091 0 cisinin .
SFX 4092 N 1
SFX 4092 0 leşti .
SFX 4093 N 1
SFX 4093 0 leştirecektir .
SFX 4095 N 1
SFX 4095 0 cikler .
SFX 4094 N 1
SFX 4094 0 duklarında .
SFX 4096 N 1
SFX 4096 0 lanamamıştır .
SFX 4097 N 1
SFX 4097 0 salardı .
SFX 4099 N 1
SFX 4099 0 dukları .
SFX 4098 N 1
SFX 4098 0 ımsı .
SFX 4100 N 1
SFX 4100 0 şmalarını .
SFX 4101 N 1
SFX 4101 0 ndiğinden .
SFX 4102 N 1
SFX 4102 0 ininde .
SFX 4103 N 1
SFX 4103 0 mediklerinde .
SFX 4105 N 1
SFX 4105 0 ılmayacağına .
SFX 4104 N 1
SFX 4104 0 uşlarını .
SFX 4106 N 1
SFX 4106 0 teceğini .
SFX 4107 N 1
SFX 4107 0 amamalarına .
SFX 4108 N 1
SFX 4108 0 liğiyse .
SFX 4109 N 1
SFX 4109 0 teceğine .
SFX 4110 N 1
SFX 4110 0 ininki .
SFX 4111 N 1
SFX 4111 0 liğindendir .
SFX 4112 N 1
SFX 4112 0 nemeyeceği .
SFX 4113 N 1
SFX 4113 0 layabileceklerini .
SFX 4115 N 1
SFX 4115 0 lidir .
SFX 4114 N 1
SFX 4114 0 sızlıktan .
SFX 4117 N 1
SFX 4117 0 nmamıştır .
SFX 4116 N 1
SFX 4116 0 leştirecekler .
SFX 4118 N 1
SFX 4118 0 ilebileceğinin .
SFX 4119 N 1
SFX 4119 0 dırdığına .
SFX 4122 N 1
SFX 4122 0 lanmam .
SFX 4121 N 1
SFX 4121 0 emeyeceklerinden .
SFX 4120 N 1
SFX 4120 0 şacağına .
SFX 4124 N 1
SFX 4124 0 larınızın .
SFX 4123 N 1
SFX 4123 0 lendiğinden .
SFX 4126 N 1
SFX 4126 0 lanmaz .
SFX 4125 N 1
SFX 4125 0 ciyle .
SFX 4127 N 1
SFX 4127 0 larımın .
SFX 4128 N 1
SFX 4128 0 uyormuş .
SFX 4129 N 1
SFX 4129 0 yebiliyor .
SFX 4130 N 1
SFX 4130 0 lanmadıklarını .
SFX 4131 N 1
SFX 4131 0 linin .
SFX 4134 N 1
SFX 4134 0 lanmak .
SFX 4133 N 1
SFX 4133 0 mışsın .
SFX 4132 N 1
SFX 4132 0 luğundaki .
SFX 4137 N 1
SFX 4137 0 larımız .
SFX 4136 N 1
SFX 4136 0 iyorlarmış .
SFX 4135 N 1
SFX 4135 0 ştiğini .
SFX 4139 N 1
SFX 4139 0 memeliler .
SFX 4138 N 1
SFX 4138 0 nmazken .
SFX 4140 N 1
SFX 4140 0 nmalıdır .
SFX 4141 N 1
SFX 4141 0 leşme .
SFX 4142 N 1
SFX 4142 0 unun .
SFX 4143 N 1
SFX 4143 0 sında .
SFX 4144 N 1
SFX 4144 0 lamasın .
SFX 4145 N 1
SFX 4145 0 unuz .
SFX 4146 N 1
SFX 4146 0 tmalarından .
SFX 4147 N 1
SFX 4147 0 mediklerinin .
SFX 4148 N 1
SFX 4148 0 cılığından .
SFX 4149 N 1
SFX 4149 0 lıklarda .
SFX 4150 N 1
SFX 4150 0 yemediği .
SFX 4151 N 1
SFX 4151 0 undaysa .
SFX 4152 N 1
SFX 4152 0 mizdeki .
SFX 4153 N 1
SFX 4153 0 leşmenin .
SFX 4154 N 1
SFX 4154 0 namayacağını .
SFX 4155 N 1
SFX 4155 0 manızın .
SFX 4156 N 1
SFX 4156 0 lıktır .
SFX 4157 N 1
SFX 4157 0 lemediği .
SFX 4158 N 1
SFX 4158 0 ttığı .
SFX 4159 N 1
SFX 4159 0 unsa .
SFX 4161 N 1
SFX 4161 0 nmadığı .
SFX 4160 N 1
SFX 4160 0 sınlar .
SFX 4162 N 1
SFX 4162 0 ndıkları .
SFX 4164 N 1
SFX 4164 0 nacağından .
SFX 4163 N 1
SFX 4163 0 cilerde .
SFX 4165 N 1
SFX 4165 0 laştırmıştı .
SFX 4166 N 1
SFX 4166 0 tamadıkları .
SFX 4167 N 1
SFX 4167 0 emeyince .
SFX 4169 N 1
SFX 4169 0 landırmanın .
SFX 4168 N 1
SFX 4168 0 leşsin .
SFX 4172 N 1
SFX 4172 0 mayışı .
SFX 4171 N 1
SFX 4171 0 ımından .
SFX 4170 N 1
SFX 4170 0 dırmıştır .
SFX 4173 N 1
SFX 4173 0 laşmışlar .
SFX 4174 N 1
SFX 4174 0 ındayım .
SFX 4175 N 1
SFX 4175 0 lenmelidir .
SFX 4176 N 1
SFX 4176 0 leştik .
SFX 4177 N 1
SFX 4177 0 lerininki .
SFX 4179 N 1
SFX 4179 0 nmasının .
SFX 4178 N 1
SFX 4178 0 acakların .
SFX 4180 N 1
SFX 4180 0 luklardan .
SFX 4182 N 1
SFX 4182 0 deyim .
SFX 4181 N 1
SFX 4181 0 mişliği .
SFX 4184 N 1
SFX 4184 0 mamın .
SFX 4183 N 1
SFX 4183 0 ştıracaklarını .
SFX 4185 N 1
SFX 4185 0 tecek .
SFX 4186 N 1
SFX 4186 0 yabilecektir .
SFX 4187 N 1
SFX 4187 0 sındaydı .
SFX 4188 N 1
SFX 4188 0 indesin .
SFX 4189 N 1
SFX 4189 0 lemeyen .
SFX 4190 N 1
SFX 4190 0 çının .
SFX 4191 N 1
SFX 4191 0 tmalar .
SFX 4192 N 1
SFX 4192 0 leşmesi .
SFX 4194 N 1
SFX 4194 0 sundan .
SFX 4193 N 1
SFX 4193 0 ılmadığı .
SFX 4195 N 1
SFX 4195 0 lediler .
SFX 4196 N 1
SFX 4196 0 lerindendir .
SFX 4197 N 1
SFX 4197 0 indekiler .
SFX 4198 N 1
SFX 4198 0 tamayacağını .
SFX 4199 N 1
SFX 4199 0 lendirmiş .
SFX 4200 N 1
SFX 4200 0 meleri .
SFX 4201 N 1
SFX 4201 0 larınızdan .
SFX 4203 N 1
SFX 4203 0 amadığında .
SFX 4202 N 1
SFX 4202 0 amamışım .
SFX 4204 N 1
SFX 4204 0 ilmektedir .
SFX 4206 N 1
SFX 4206 0 lığıyla .
SFX 4205 N 1
SFX 4205 0 yabildiğine .
SFX 4207 N 1
SFX 4207 0 amamışız .
SFX 4208 N 1
SFX 4208 0 ımızın .
SFX 4210 N 1
SFX 4210 0 yabildiğini .
SFX 4209 N 1
SFX 4209 0 melere .
SFX 4211 N 1
SFX 4211 0 abilecektir .
SFX 4213 N 1
SFX 4213 0 lığını .
SFX 4212 N 1
SFX 4212 0 ınaysa .
SFX 4214 N 1
SFX 4214 0 diğinizi .
SFX 4215 N 1
SFX 4215 0 lığıydı .
SFX 4217 N 1
SFX 4217 0 tılacağını .
SFX 4216 N 1
SFX 4216 0 yebildikleri .
SFX 4218 N 1
SFX 4218 0 laştırılır .
SFX 4219 N 1
SFX 4219 0 ebilmeleri .
SFX 4220 N 1
SFX 4220 0 laştırılıp .
SFX 4221 N 1
SFX 4221 0 laşmayacak .
SFX 4223 N 1
SFX 4223 0 ınca .
SFX 4222 N 1
SFX 4222 0 eydi .
SFX 4224 N 1
SFX 4224 0 landırdıkları .
SFX 4228 N 1
SFX 4228 0 yacağız .
SFX 4227 N 1
SFX 4227 0 dırdıkları .
SFX 4226 N 1
SFX 4226 0 üyüm .
SFX 4225 N 1
SFX 4225 0 landırmadan .
SFX 4230 N 1
SFX 4230 0 emeyecekleri .
SFX 4229 N 1
SFX 4229 0 namamıştır .
SFX 4231 N 1
SFX 4231 0 ımlar .
SFX 4232 N 1
SFX 4232 0 lığımı .
SFX 4233 N 1
SFX 4233 0 lamayla .
SFX 4234 N 1
SFX 4234 0 ımdaki .
SFX 4235 N 1
SFX 4235 0 ından .
SFX 4236 N 1
SFX 4236 0 leş .
SFX 4237 N 1
SFX 4237 0 lenememiş .
SFX 4239 N 1
SFX 4239 0 yacağım .
SFX 4238 N 1
SFX 4238 0 mıştınız .
SFX 4240 N 1
SFX 4240 0 mediğinde .
SFX 4241 N 1
SFX 4241 0 ılmıyor .
SFX 4243 N 1
SFX 4243 0 ilmiştir .
SFX 4242 N 1
SFX 4242 0 layamadığından .
SFX 4245 N 1
SFX 4245 0 ındayız .
SFX 4244 N 1
SFX 4244 0 yeceklerdir .
SFX 4246 N 1
SFX 4246 0 amıyorlar .
SFX 4247 N 1
SFX 4247 0 deyiz .
SFX 4248 N 1
SFX 4248 0 enler .
SFX 4249 N 1
SFX 4249 0 lılarla .
SFX 4250 N 1
SFX 4250 0 leştirilemeyeceğini .
SFX 4251 N 1
SFX 4251 0 dırmalarına .
SFX 4253 N 1
SFX 4253 0 ılanlar .
SFX 4252 N 1
SFX 4252 0 isiniz .
SFX 4254 N 1
SFX 4254 0 luğum .
SFX 4255 N 1
SFX 4255 0 luğun .
SFX 4256 N 1
SFX 4256 0 dendir .
SFX 4257 N 1
SFX 4257 0 umdan .
SFX 4258 N 1
SFX 4258 0 lardaki .
SFX 4259 N 1
SFX 4259 0 ırlarsa .
SFX 4260 N 1
SFX 4260 0 laşacaklarını .
SFX 4261 N 1
SFX 4261 0 tmediğini .
SFX 4262 N 1
SFX 4262 0 larından .
SFX 4263 N 1
SFX 4263 0 nmişti .
SFX 4264 N 1
SFX 4264 0 lenerek .
SFX 4265 N 1
SFX 4265 0 cilerine .
SFX 4266 N 1
SFX 4266 0 ılmalıdır .
SFX 4267 N 1
SFX 4267 0 lemekten .
SFX 4268 N 1
SFX 4268 0 nmalarından .
SFX 4269 N 1
SFX 4269 0 ndikten .
SFX 4270 N 1
SFX 4270 0 layacak .
SFX 4271 N 1
SFX 4271 0 mıza .
SFX 4272 N 1
SFX 4272 0 cılarına .
SFX 4273 N 1
SFX 4273 0 cilerini .
SFX 4277 N 1
SFX 4277 0 ında .
SFX 4276 N 1
SFX 4276 0 eyim .
SFX 4275 N 1
SFX 4275 0 unla .
SFX 4274 N 1
SFX 4274 0 tılıyor .
SFX 4278 N 1
SFX 4278 0 emeyeceklerdir .
SFX 4280 N 1
SFX 4280 0 leşmeli .
SFX 4279 N 1
SFX 4279 0 ınadır .
SFX 4281 N 1
SFX 4281 0 mişsinizdir .
SFX 4282 N 1
SFX 4282 0 ıklığının .
